Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 PART A 3 GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 4 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 5 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 6 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 7 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 8 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 9 used for the purposes designated: 10 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 11 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 12 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 13 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,727,294 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 420.00 16 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 17 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 18 technology to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 19 wine industry institute: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 21 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 22 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 23 of management. The report must describe in detail the 24 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 25 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 26 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 27 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 28 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 29 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 30 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 31 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 32 designated: 33 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 34 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 35 -1- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 1/ 24 H.F. _____ 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 1 miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 3 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 4 FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 5 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 6 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 7 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 8 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 9 used for the purposes designated: 10 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 11 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 13 Sec. 4. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 14 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 15 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 16 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 17 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 18 used for the purposes designated: 19 1. DAIRY REGULATION 20 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 21 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 22 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 24 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 25 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 26 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 30 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 31 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 33 b. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 34 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 35 -2- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 2/ 24 H.F. _____ the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 1 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 2 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 3 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 4 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 5 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 6 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 7 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 8 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 9 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 10 affiliated with a national organization that promotes 11 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 13 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 14 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 15 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 16 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 17 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 18 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 19 For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and 20 response fund created in section 163.3B : 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 22 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 23 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 24 disabilities: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 26 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 27 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 28 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 29 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 30 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 31 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 32 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 33 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 34 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 35 -3- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 3/ 24 H.F. _____ farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 1 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 2 modification consultations, peer support services, services 3 to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 4 services. 5 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 6 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 7 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 8 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 9 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 10 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 11 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 12 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 14 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 15 $260,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 16 account. 17 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 18 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 19 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 20 $40,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 21 account. 22 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 23 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 24 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 25 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 26 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12 : 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 28 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 29 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 30 8. GRAIN REGULATION 31 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 32 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 33 miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 35 -4- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 4/ 24 H.F. _____ 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 1 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 2 187.201 : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 4 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 5 the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the 6 value-added agricultural grant program created in section 7 187.321 . 8 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 9 department may use up to $813,000 to support the choose Iowa 10 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 11 part 1 . 12 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 13 department shall use at least $500,000 to support the dairy 14 innovation and revitalization program created in section 15 187.311 . 16 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 17 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 18 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 19 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 20 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 21 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 22 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 23 such action. 24 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD BANK PURCHASING PROGRAM 25 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 26 bank purchasing program to assist eligible participants in 27 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.331 : 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 29 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 30 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 31 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 32 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 33 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 34 PART B 35 -5- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 5/ 24 H.F. _____ CONTINGENT APPROPRIATIONS 1 Sec. 5. CHOOSE IOWA SCHOOL PURCHASING PROGRAM. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 5 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 6 used for the purposes designated: 7 For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa school purchasing 8 program to assist eligible schools and school districts in 9 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.307: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 11 Sec. 6. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This part of this 12 division of this Act takes effect July 1, 2026, if 2026 Iowa 13 Acts, House File 2748, or successor legislation, is enacted. 14 DIVISION II 15 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 16 Sec. 7. GENERAL FUND. 17 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 18 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 19 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 20 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 21 purposes designated: 22 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 23 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 24 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 25 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,145.95 28 2. Of the number of full-time equivalent positions 29 authorized to the department pursuant to subsection 1, 50.00 30 full-time equivalent positions shall be allocated by the 31 department for seasonal employees for purposes of providing 32 maintenance, upkeep, and sanitary services at state parks. 33 This subsection shall not impact conservation officer, park 34 ranger, or park manager positions within the department. 35 -6- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 6/ 24 H.F. _____ 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 1 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department of 2 management. The report must describe in detail the expenditure 3 of moneys appropriated under this section to support the 4 departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 5 Sec. 8. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 6 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 7 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 8 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 9 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 10 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 11 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 12 designated: 13 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 14 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 15 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 16 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 17 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 18 and miscellaneous purposes: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 20 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 21 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 22 protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 23 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances 24 of conservation peace officers employed in a protection 25 occupation, as described in section 97B.49B , who retire. 26 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 27 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 28 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 29 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as is necessary to fund 30 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 31 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 32 subsection 1. 33 Sec. 9. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There 34 is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created 35 -7- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 7/ 24 H.F. _____ in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for 1 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2 2027, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to 3 that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 4 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 5 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 6 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 7 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 8 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 10 Sec. 10. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ INTEREST AND 11 EARNINGS ââ WATER QUALITY. 12 1. There is appropriated from interest and earnings on 13 moneys in the groundwater protection fund created in section 14 455E.11 and accounts therein, as described in section 455E.11, 15 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ, to the department of natural 16 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 17 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 18 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 20 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 21 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 22 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 254,150 24 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the amount appropriated 25 in this section shall not exceed the total amount of interest 26 and earnings on moneys in the groundwater protection fund and 27 accounts therein accrued during the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2026. In addition, the amount appropriated in this 29 section shall only be made available after the maximum amount 30 of such interest and earnings appropriated in this Act is 31 made available to the state university of Iowa to support 32 groundwater monitoring. 33 Sec. 11. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 34 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 35 -8- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 8/ 24 H.F. _____ fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 1 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 2 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 3 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 5 snowmobile programs: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 7 Sec. 12. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 8 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 9 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 10 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 11 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 12 designated: 13 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 14 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 15 safety: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 17 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 18 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 19 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 20 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 21 frequency analysis. 22 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 23 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 24 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 25 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 26 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 27 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 28 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 29 programs: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 31 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 32 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 33 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 34 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 35 -9- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 9/ 24 H.F. _____ close of the succeeding fiscal year. 1 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 2 For supporting operations at state parks, including 3 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 5 4. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE 6 For structural and infrastructural repairs in state parks: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 8 DIVISION III 9 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 10 Sec. 13. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 11 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa 12 state university of science and technology for the fiscal year 13 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 14 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 15 purposes designated: 16 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 17 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 18 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 19 laboratory, and for not more than the following full-time 20 equivalent positions: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,799,898 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 51.00 23 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 24 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 25 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 26 appropriation made in this subsection. 27 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 28 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 29 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 30 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 31 science and technologyâs budget units. 32 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 33 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 34 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 35 -10- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 10/ 24 H.F. _____ providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 1 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa, and for 2 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 5 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 6 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 7 economics in administering this subsection. 8 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 9 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 10 created in section 267.8 : 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 12 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 13 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 14 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 15 producers. 16 Sec. 14. IOWA NUTRIENT RESEARCH FUND ââ VETERINARY 17 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46 , there 18 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 19 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 20 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 21 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 22 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 24 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 25 laboratory: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 27 DIVISION IV 28 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 29 Sec. 15. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 30 (I-CASH). 31 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 32 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 33 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 34 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -11- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 11/ 24 H.F. _____ designated: 1 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 2 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 3 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 4 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 5 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 6 members of the agricultural community: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 8 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 9 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 10 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 11 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 12 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 13 July 1, 2026, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 14 beginning July 1, 2025. 15 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 16 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 17 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 18 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 19 subsection 1. 20 3. If moneys appropriated in subsection 1 revert as required 21 pursuant to section 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall 22 transfer to the general fund of the state from any otherwise 23 unencumbered or unobligated moneys from any other general 24 fund appropriation or from any moneys available from other 25 funding sources an amount equal to the amount appropriated in 26 subsection 1 less any amount that reverted to the general fund 27 of the state pursuant to section 8.33 . 28 Sec. 16. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ IIHR ââ 29 HYDROSCIENCE AND ENGINEERING ââ GROUNDWATER MONITORING. 30 1. There is appropriated from interest and earnings on 31 moneys in the groundwater protection fund created in section 32 455E.11 and accounts therein, as described in section 455E.11, 33 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ, to the state university of Iowa 34 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 35 -12- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 12/ 24 H.F. _____ 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 1 to be used for the purposes designated: 2 To support groundwater monitoring as administered by the 3 IIHR ââ hydroscience and engineering within the college of 4 engineering of the state university of Iowa: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 6 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the amount appropriated 7 in this section shall not exceed the total amount of interest 8 and earnings on moneys in the groundwater protection fund and 9 accounts therein accrued during the fiscal year beginning July 10 1, 2026. 11 Sec. 17. Section 16.153, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) There is appropriated from the fund 14 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 15 July 1, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, two hundred 16 fifty thousand dollars to be used by the Iowa geological survey 17 as provided in subparagraph (2). 18 (2) The moneys appropriated in subparagraph (1) shall 19 be used by the Iowa geological survey to map and assess the 20 condition of this stateâs aquifers. The Iowa geological survey 21 may measure the volume of the groundwater that is available 22 for various uses, the current and predicted allocations of 23 groundwater to support those uses, the recharge rate for the 24 aquifers, and the development of models for budgeting this 25 stateâs water resources. 26 (3) This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2030. 27 DIVISION V 28 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 29 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 30 STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 31 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 32 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 33 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so 34 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -13- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 13/ 24 H.F. _____ designated: 1 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 2 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 3 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 4 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 5 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 7 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 8 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 9 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 10 c. Notwithstanding section 8.57A, subsection 3, or any 11 other provision of law to the contrary, the department may use 12 moneys appropriated in this subsection, in combination with 13 other appropriate environment first fund appropriations, for 14 cost sharing to match United States department of agriculture, 15 natural resources conservation service, wetlands reserve 16 enhancement program (WREP) funding available to Iowa. 17 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 18 a. For continuation of a program that provides 19 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 20 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 22 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 23 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 24 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 25 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) 26 a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the 27 implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and 28 to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to 29 improve water quality and habitat: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 31 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 32 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 33 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 34 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 35 -14- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 14/ 24 H.F. _____ a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 1 conservation: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 3 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 4 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 5 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 7 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 8 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 9 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 10 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 11 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 12 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 13 districts: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 15 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 16 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 17 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 18 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 19 to establish management practices for the control of soil 20 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 21 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 22 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 23 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 24 expended by the district for that same purpose. 25 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 26 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 27 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 28 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 29 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 30 practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 31 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 32 161A.73 . 33 g. The departmentâs division of soil conservation and 34 water quality may allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph 35 -15- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 15/ 24 H.F. _____ âcâ to conduct research and demonstration projects to promote 1 conservation tillage and nonpoint source pollution control 2 practices. 3 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 4 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 5 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 6 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 7 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 8 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 9 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 10 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 11 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 13 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 14 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 15 assistance. 16 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 17 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 18 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 19 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 20 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 21 used for the purposes designated: 22 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 23 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 24 staff time associated with these activities: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 26 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 27 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 28 information system data for their use in developing, 29 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 31 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 32 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 33 quality monitoring stations: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 35 -16- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 16/ 24 H.F. _____ 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 1 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 2 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 4 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 5 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 6 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 8 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 9 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 11 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 12 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 13 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 14 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 15 standards from particulate matter: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 17 Sec. 20. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 18 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 19 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 20 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 21 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 22 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 24 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 25 geological survey of the state created pursuant to section 26 456.1 , including but not limited to providing analysis; 27 data maintenance, collection, and compilation; investigative 28 programs; and information for water supply development and 29 protection: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 31 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 32 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 33 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 34 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 35 -17- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 17/ 24 H.F. _____ resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 1 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 2 and 456.14 : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 4 Sec. 21. REVERSION. 5 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 6 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 7 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in this division of this 8 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 9 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 10 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 11 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 12 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 13 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 14 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in this division of 15 this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 16 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 17 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 18 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 19 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 20 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 21 beginning July 1, 2029. 22 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 23 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 24 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 25 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 26 DIVISION VI 27 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 28 Sec. 22. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 29 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 30 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 31 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 32 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 33 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 34 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -18- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 18/ 24 H.F. _____ designated: 1 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 2 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 3 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 4 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 5 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 7 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 8 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 9 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 10 by the water resources coordinating council established 11 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 12 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 13 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 14 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 15 watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 16 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 17 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 18 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 19 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 20 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 21 as defined in section 455B.171 . 22 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 23 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 24 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 25 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 26 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 27 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 28 subwatershed. 29 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 30 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 31 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 32 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 33 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 34 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 35 -19- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 19/ 24 H.F. _____ whichever is less. 1 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 2 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 3 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 4 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 5 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 6 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 7 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 8 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 9 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 10 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 11 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 12 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 13 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 14 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 15 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 16 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 17 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 18 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 19 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 20 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 21 efforts provided in this section. 22 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 23 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 24 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 25 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 26 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 27 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 28 in chapter 161A . 29 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 30 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 31 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 32 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 33 the department from a state or federal source. 34 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 35 -20- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 20/ 24 H.F. _____ this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 1 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 2 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 3 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 4 DIVISION VII 5 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 6 Sec. 23. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 7 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 8 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 9 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 10 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 11 30, 2027, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 12 section 455A.19 : 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 14 Sec. 24. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 15 MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 16 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ, 17 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 18 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 19 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 20 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 21 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 22 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. 23 DIVISION VIII 24 ANIMAL DISEASE PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE 25 Sec. 25. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ DEPARTMENT 26 OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 27 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 28 prevention fund created in section 165.18 to the department of 29 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 30 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 31 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 32 designated: 33 a. For purposes of purchasing and maintaining equipment 34 to further the implementation of the foreign animal disease 35 -21- LSB 5001YC (12) 91 sb/js 21/ 24 H.F. _____ preparedness and response strategy developed under section 1 163.3C : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 3 b. For purposes of assisting in the development of vaccines 4 against foreign animal diseases by a company based in Iowa that 5 develops livestock and other animal vaccines: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 7 c. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 8 and response fund created in section 163.3B : 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 10 d. For purposes of upgrading information technology 11 resources used by the department: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 160,000 13 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 14 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 15 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 16 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 17 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 18 Sec. 26. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ IOWA 19 STATE UNIVERSITY. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal 20 disease prevention fund created in section 165.18 to Iowa 21 state university of science and technology for the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 23 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 24 purposes designated: 25 To assist the college of veterinary medicine veterinary 26 diagnostic laboratory in installing and moving equipment into 27 its refurbished facility: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 29